Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 29 O.S. 2021, Section 3-201, as


amended by Section 265, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (29 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 3-201), is amended to read as follows:


Section 3-201. A. All things being equal, veterans of World


War II, the Korean, the Vietnam and Persian Gulf Wars shall Any


veterans shall be appointed as game wardens when vacancies occur.


B. All persons appointed game wardens shall be peace officers


and have the full powers of peace officers of the State of Oklahoma


in the enforcement of the provisions of this Code and are authorized


to:



Req. No. 3170 Page 1


1. Enforce all state laws on Department-owned or Department-


managed lands;


2. Enforce all other laws of this state;


3. Make arrests for wildlife conservation violations and


nonconservation-related crimes with the same power and authority as


sheriffs are vested with and in cooperation with other law


enforcement officers and agencies;


4. Take into possession any and all protected wildlife, or any


part thereof, killed, taken, shipped or in any possession contrary


to the law, and the wildlife or parts thereof may be disposed of as


determined by the Director or any court of competent jurisdiction;


5. Make a complaint and cause proceedings to be commenced


against any person for violation of any of the laws for the


protection and propagation of wildlife, with the sanction of the


prosecuting or district attorney of the county in which the


proceedings are brought, and shall not be required to give security


for costs;


6. Be an authorized agent of the Commission or Department under


Section 3-202 of this title in addition to duties as a game warden;


and


7. Assist in enforcement of the state fire laws, upon request


of the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry.


C. 1. Pursuant to the provisions of this subsection, a game


warden may operate a vehicle owned or leased by the Department upon

Req. No. 3170 Page 2


a roadway during the hours of darkness without lighted headlamps,


clearance lamps, or other illuminating devices. As used in this


paragraph, “roadway” shall include any street or highway in this


state except an interstate highway, a limited access highway, a


state trunk highway, or any street or highway within the limits of


an incorporated area.


2. Pursuant to the provisions of this subsection, a game warden


may operate a vessel upon any waters of this state during the hours


of darkness without the illuminating devices required by Section


4207 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


3. A game warden may operate a vehicle or vessel without the


illuminating devices specified in this subsection only if the


operation:


a. is made in the performance of the duties of the game


warden pursuant to the provisions of the Code, and


b. (1) will aid in the accomplishment of a lawful arrest


for any violation of the Code or any rule or


regulation promulgated thereto, or


(2) will aid in ascertaining whether a violation of


the Code or any rule or regulation promulgated


thereto has been or is about to be committed.


D. Any person who refuses to stop a vehicle or boat when


requested to do so by a game warden in the performance of the duties


of the game warden is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is

Req. No. 3170 Page 3


punishable by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00)


nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).


E. Any game warden who solicits or accepts any bribe or money


or other thing of value in connection with the performance of duty


as a game warden shall be guilty of a Class C2 felony offense and,


upon conviction, shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as


provided for in subsections B through F of Section 20M of Title 21


of the Oklahoma Statutes and shall be summarily removed from office.


F. Pursuant to the provisions of subsection B of this section


and the Oklahoma Wildlife Conservation Code, a game warden shall not


have authority to use or place a game or wildlife camera on private


property without the permission of the owner or controller of the


property or pursuant to a warrant issued by a court of competent


jurisdiction.


G. A game warden shall not enter private property without


probable cause, and the sound of gunshots alone shall not constitute


probable cause. Game wardens shall obtain consent from the property


owner to investigate private land.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3170 YG 1/15/2026 2:07:56 PM







Req. No. 3170 Page 4